Maryland, session 2026, SB1003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–327.
(b) [(1)] The Sheriff of Howard County shall receive:
[(i) An annual salary of $109,000 for calendar year 2021; and
(ii)] (1) For calendar year 2022 [and each subsequent] THROUGH
calendar year 2026, an annual salary equal to the salary of a major on step 6 of the Howard
County Police Management Schedule for the first year of the Sheriff’s term[.];
– 1 –

Ch. 581 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) [The salary of the Sheriff shall increase annually, according to the
Howard County Police Management Schedule, for as long as the individual holds the
position of Sheriff] AN ANNUAL SALARY OF $220,601 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2027;
(3) AN ANNUAL SALARY OF $227,230 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2028;
(4) AN ANNUAL SALARY OF $234,079 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2029; AND
(5) AN ANNUAL SALARY OF $241,149 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2030 AND
EACH SUBSEQUENT CALENDAR YEAR.
Article – Criminal Procedure
15–414.
(a) This section applies only in Howard County.
(b) The ANNUAL State’s Attorney’s salary is [equal]:
(1) EQUAL to the salary of a judge of the District Court of Maryland FOR
CALENDAR YEAR 2026;
(2) $220,601 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2027;
(3) $227,230 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2028;
(4) $234,079 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2029; AND
(5) $241,149 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2030 AND EACH SUBSEQUENT
CALENDAR YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Howard County or the State’s Attorney of
Howard County while serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this
Act, but the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of
Howard County or the State’s Attorney of Howard County shall take effect at the beginning
of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed
or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 581
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –